test/src/gt-gloss-yamls/NI_C_makizin_gt-glossing.yaml
     X+mkizin+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej: makzinenymish
     X+mkizin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej: makzinensmish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 5
     1+mkizin+NI+Con+ThmPos+1+Pl: nmakzinenyminaa
     1+mkizin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+1+Pl: nmakzinensminaa
     2+mkizin+NI+Con+ThmPos+1+Pl: gmakzinenyminaa
     2+mkizin+NI+Con+ThmPos+2+Pl: gmakzinenymiwaa
     2+mkizin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+1+Pl: gmakzinensminaa
     2+mkizin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+2+Pl: gmakzinensmiwaa
     3+mkizin+NI+Con+ThmPos+2+Pl: makzinenymiwaa
     3+mkizin+NI+Con+ThmPos+3+4: makzinenymini
     3+mkizin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+2+Pl: makzinensmiwaa
     3+mkizin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+3+4: makzinensmini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 6
     1+mkizin+NI+Con+ThmPos+Prt: nmakzinenymiba
     1+mkizin+NI+Con+ThmPos+Voc+Pl: nmakzinenymidig
     1+mkizin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Prt: nmakzinensmiba
     1+mkizin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Voc+Pl: nmakzinensmidig
     2+mkizin+NI+Con+ThmPos+Prt: gmakzinenymiba
     2+mkizin+NI+Con+ThmPos+Voc+Pl: gmakzinenymidig
     2+mkizin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Prt: gmakzinensmiba
     2+mkizin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Voc+Pl: gmakzinensmidig
     3+mkizin+NI+Con+ThmPos+Prt: makzinenymiba
     3+mkizin+NI+Con+ThmPos+Voc+Pl: makzinenymidig
     3+mkizin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Prt: makzinensmiba
     3+mkizin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Voc+Pl: makzinensmidig
     X+mkizin+NI+Con+ThmPos+Prt: makzinenymiba
     X+mkizin+NI+Con+ThmPos+Voc+Pl: makzinenymidig
     X+mkizin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Prt: makzinensmiba
     X+mkizin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Voc+Pl: makzinensmidig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 7
     1+mkizin+NI+Con+ThmPos+4: nmakzinenyman
     1+mkizin+NI+Con+ThmPos+Loc: nmakzinenyming
     1+mkizin+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pl: nmakzinenyman
     1+mkizin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+4: nmakzinensman
     1+mkizin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Loc: nmakzinensming
     1+mkizin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pl: nmakzinensman
     2+mkizin+NI+Con+ThmPos+4: gmakzinenyman
     2+mkizin+NI+Con+ThmPos+Loc: gmakzinenyming
     2+mkizin+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pl: gmakzinenyman
     2+mkizin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+4: gmakzinensman
     2+mkizin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Loc: gmakzinensming
     2+mkizin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pl: gmakzinensman
     3+mkizin+NI+Con+ThmPos+4: makzinenyman
     3+mkizin+NI+Con+ThmPos+Loc: makzinenyming
     3+mkizin+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pl: makzinenyman
     3+mkizin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+4: makzinensman
     3+mkizin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Loc: makzinensming
     3+mkizin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pl: makzinensman
     X+mkizin+NI+Con+ThmPos+4: makzinenyman
     X+mkizin+NI+Con+ThmPos+Loc: makzinenyming
     X+mkizin+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pl: makzinenyman
     X+mkizin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+4: makzinensman
     X+mkizin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Loc: makzinensming
     X+mkizin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pl: makzinensman
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4, 5
     1+mkizin+NI+Con+Pej+1+Pl: nmakzinenyshinaa
     1+mkizin+NI+Dim+Pej+1+Pl: nmakzinensshinaa
     2+mkizin+NI+Con+Pej+1+Pl: gmakzinenyshinaa
     2+mkizin+NI+Con+Pej+2+Pl: gmakzinenyshiwaa
     2+mkizin+NI+Dim+Pej+1+Pl: gmakzinensshinaa
     2+mkizin+NI+Dim+Pej+2+Pl: gmakzinensshiwaa
     3+mkizin+NI+Con+Pej+2+Pl: makzinenyshiwaa
     3+mkizin+NI+Con+Pej+3+4: makzinenyshini
     3+mkizin+NI+Dim+Pej+2+Pl: makzinensshiwaa
     3+mkizin+NI+Dim+Pej+3+4: makzinensshini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4, 6
     1+mkizin+NI+Con+Pej+Prt: nmakzinenyshiba
     1+mkizin+NI+Con+Pej+Voc+Pl: nmakzinenyshidig
     1+mkizin+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt: nmakzinensshiba
     1+mkizin+NI+Dim+Pej+Voc+Pl: nmakzinensshidig
     2+mkizin+NI+Con+Pej+Prt: gmakzinenyshiba
     2+mkizin+NI+Con+Pej+Voc+Pl: gmakzinenyshidig
     2+mkizin+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt: gmakzinensshiba
     2+mkizin+NI+Dim+Pej+Voc+Pl: gmakzinensshidig
     3+mkizin+NI+Con+Pej+Prt: makzinenyshiba
     3+mkizin+NI+Con+Pej+Voc+Pl: makzinenyshidig
     3+mkizin+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt: makzinensshiba
     3+mkizin+NI+Dim+Pej+Voc+Pl: makzinensshidig
     X+mkizin+NI+Con+Pej+Prt: makzinenyshiba
     X+mkizin+NI+Con+Pej+Voc+Pl: makzinenyshidig
     X+mkizin+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt: makzinensshiba
     X+mkizin+NI+Dim+Pej+Voc+Pl: makzinensshidig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4, 7
     1+mkizin+NI+Con+Pej+4: nmakzinenyshan
     1+mkizin+NI+Con+Pej+Loc: nmakzinenyshing
     1+mkizin+NI+Con+Pej+Pl: nmakzinenyshan
     1+mkizin+NI+Dim+Pej+4: nmakzinensshan
     1+mkizin+NI+Dim+Pej+Loc: nmakzinensshing
     1+mkizin+NI+Dim+Pej+Pl: nmakzinensshan
     2+mkizin+NI+Con+Pej+4: gmakzinenyshan
     2+mkizin+NI+Con+Pej+Loc: gmakzinenyshing
     2+mkizin+NI+Con+Pej+Pl: gmakzinenyshan
     2+mkizin+NI+Dim+Pej+4: gmakzinensshan
     2+mkizin+NI+Dim+Pej+Loc: gmakzinensshing
     2+mkizin+NI+Dim+Pej+Pl: gmakzinensshan
     3+mkizin+NI+Con+Pej+4: makzinenyshan
     3+mkizin+NI+Con+Pej+Loc: makzinenyshing
     3+mkizin+NI+Con+Pej+Pl: makzinenyshan
     3+mkizin+NI+Dim+Pej+4: makzinensshan
     3+mkizin+NI+Dim+Pej+Loc: makzinensshing
     3+mkizin+NI+Dim+Pej+Pl: makzinensshan
     X+mkizin+NI+Con+Pej+4: makzinenyshan
     X+mkizin+NI+Con+Pej+Loc: makzinenyshing
     X+mkizin+NI+Con+Pej+Pl: makzinenyshan
     X+mkizin+NI+Dim+Pej+4: makzinensshan
     X+mkizin+NI+Dim+Pej+Loc: makzinensshing
     X+mkizin+NI+Dim+Pej+Pl: makzinensshan
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 5, 6
     1+mkizin+NI+Con+1+Pl+Prt: nmakzinenynaanba
     1+mkizin+NI+Con+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: nmakzinenynaandig
     1+mkizin+NI+Dim+1+Pl+Prt: nmakzinensnaanba
     1+mkizin+NI+Dim+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: nmakzinensnaandig
     2+mkizin+NI+Con+1+Pl+Prt: gmakzinenynaanba
     2+mkizin+NI+Con+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gmakzinenynaandig
     2+mkizin+NI+Con+2+Pl+Prt: gmakzinenywaaba
     2+mkizin+NI+Con+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: gmakzinenywaadig
     2+mkizin+NI+Dim+1+Pl+Prt: gmakzinensnaanba
     2+mkizin+NI+Dim+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gmakzinensnaandig
     2+mkizin+NI+Dim+2+Pl+Prt: gmakzinenswaaba
     2+mkizin+NI+Dim+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: gmakzinenswaadig
     3+mkizin+NI+Con+2+Pl+Prt: makzinenywaaba
     3+mkizin+NI+Con+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: makzinenywaadig
     3+mkizin+NI+Con+3+4+Prt: makzinenyniwba
     3+mkizin+NI+Con+3+4+Voc+Pl: makzinenyniwdig
     3+mkizin+NI+Dim+2+Pl+Prt: makzinenswaaba
     3+mkizin+NI+Dim+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: makzinenswaadig
     3+mkizin+NI+Dim+3+4+Prt: makzinensniwba
     3+mkizin+NI+Dim+3+4+Voc+Pl: makzinensniwdig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 5, 7
     1+mkizin+NI+Con+1+Pl+4: nmakzinenynaanin
     1+mkizin+NI+Con+1+Pl+Loc: nmakzinenynaaning
     1+mkizin+NI+Con+1+Pl+Pl: nmakzinenynaanin
     1+mkizin+NI+Dim+1+Pl+4: nmakzinensnaanin
     1+mkizin+NI+Dim+1+Pl+Loc: nmakzinensnaaning
     1+mkizin+NI+Dim+1+Pl+Pl: nmakzinensnaanin
     2+mkizin+NI+Con+1+Pl+4: gmakzinenynaanin
     2+mkizin+NI+Con+1+Pl+Loc: gmakzinenynaaning
     2+mkizin+NI+Con+1+Pl+Pl: gmakzinenynaanin
     2+mkizin+NI+Con+2+Pl+4: gmakzinenywaan
     2+mkizin+NI+Con+2+Pl+Loc: gmakzinenywaang
     2+mkizin+NI+Con+2+Pl+Pl: gmakzinenywaan
     2+mkizin+NI+Dim+1+Pl+4: gmakzinensnaanin
     2+mkizin+NI+Dim+1+Pl+Loc: gmakzinensnaaning
     2+mkizin+NI+Dim+1+Pl+Pl: gmakzinensnaanin
     2+mkizin+NI+Dim+2+Pl+4: gmakzinenswaan
     2+mkizin+NI+Dim+2+Pl+Loc: gmakzinenswaang
     2+mkizin+NI+Dim+2+Pl+Pl: gmakzinenswaan
     3+mkizin+NI+Con+2+Pl+4: makzinenywaan
     3+mkizin+NI+Con+2+Pl+Loc: makzinenywaang
     3+mkizin+NI+Con+2+Pl+Pl: makzinenywaan
     3+mkizin+NI+Con+3+4+4: makzinenyniwan
     3+mkizin+NI+Con+3+4+Loc: makzinenyniing
     3+mkizin+NI+Con+3+4+Pl: makzinenyniwan
     3+mkizin+NI+Dim+2+Pl+4: makzinenswaan
     3+mkizin+NI+Dim+2+Pl+Loc: makzinenswaang
     3+mkizin+NI+Dim+2+Pl+Pl: makzinenswaan
     3+mkizin+NI+Dim+3+4+4: makzinensniwan
     3+mkizin+NI+Dim+3+4+Loc: makzinensniing
     3+mkizin+NI+Dim+3+4+Pl: makzinensniwan
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 6, 7
     1+mkizin+NI+Con+Prt+4: nmakzinenybaniin
     1+mkizin+NI+Con+Prt+Loc: nmakzinenybaniing
     1+mkizin+NI+Con+Prt+Pl: nmakzinenybaniin
     1+mkizin+NI+Dim+Prt+4: nmakzinensbaniin
     1+mkizin+NI+Dim+Prt+Loc: nmakzinensbaniing
     1+mkizin+NI+Dim+Prt+Pl: nmakzinensbaniin
     2+mkizin+NI+Con+Prt+4: gmakzinenybaniin
     2+mkizin+NI+Con+Prt+Loc: gmakzinenybaniing
     2+mkizin+NI+Con+Prt+Pl: gmakzinenybaniin
     2+mkizin+NI+Dim+Prt+4: gmakzinensbaniin
     2+mkizin+NI+Dim+Prt+Loc: gmakzinensbaniing
     2+mkizin+NI+Dim+Prt+Pl: gmakzinensbaniin
     3+mkizin+NI+Con+Prt+4: makzinenybaniin
     3+mkizin+NI+Con+Prt+Loc: makzinenybaniing
     3+mkizin+NI+Con+Prt+Pl: makzinenybaniin
     3+mkizin+NI+Dim+Prt+4: makzinensbaniin
     3+mkizin+NI+Dim+Prt+Loc: makzinensbaniing
     3+mkizin+NI+Dim+Prt+Pl: makzinensbaniin
     X+mkizin+NI+Con+Prt+4: makzinenybaniin
     X+mkizin+NI+Con+Prt+Loc: makzinenybaniing
     X+mkizin+NI+Con+Prt+Pl: makzinenybaniin
     X+mkizin+NI+Dim+Prt+4: makzinensbaniin
     X+mkizin+NI+Dim+Prt+Loc: makzinensbaniing
     X+mkizin+NI+Dim+Prt+Pl: makzinensbaniin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 5
     1+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl: nmakzinmishnaa
     2+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl: gmakzinmishnaa
     2+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl: gmakzinmishwaa
     3+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl: makzinmishwaa
     3+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+Pej+3+4: makzinmishni
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 6
     1+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+Pej+Prt: nmakzinmishba
     1+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+Pej+Voc+Pl: nmakzinmishdig
     2+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+Pej+Prt: gmakzinmishba
     2+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+Pej+Voc+Pl: gmakzinmishdig
     3+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+Pej+Prt: makzinmishba
     3+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+Pej+Voc+Pl: makzinmishdig
     X+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+Pej+Prt: makzinmishba
     X+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+Pej+Voc+Pl: makzinmishdig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 7
     1+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+Pej+4: nmakzinmishan
     1+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+Pej+Loc: nmakzinmishing
     1+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+Pej+Pl: nmakzinmishan
     2+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+Pej+4: gmakzinmishan
     2+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+Pej+Loc: gmakzinmishing
     2+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+Pej+Pl: gmakzinmishan
     3+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+Pej+4: makzinmishan
     3+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+Pej+Loc: makzinmishing
     3+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+Pej+Pl: makzinmishan
     X+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+Pej+4: makzinmishan
     X+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+Pej+Loc: makzinmishing
     X+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+Pej+Pl: makzinmishan
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5, 6
     1+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt: nmakzinminaanba
     1+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: nmakzinminaandig
     2+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt: gmakzinminaanba
     2+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gmakzinminaandig
     2+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt: gmakzinmiwaaba
     2+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: gmakzinmiwaadig
     3+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt: makzinmiwaaba
     3+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: makzinmiwaadig
     3+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+3+4+Prt: makzinminwiba
     3+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+3+4+Voc+Pl: makzinminwidig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5, 7
     1+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+1+Pl+4: nmakzinminaanin
     1+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+1+Pl+Loc: nmakzinminaaning
     1+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+1+Pl+Pl: nmakzinminaanin
     2+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+1+Pl+4: gmakzinminaanin
     2+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+1+Pl+Loc: gmakzinminaaning
     2+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+1+Pl+Pl: gmakzinminaanin
     2+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+2+Pl+4: gmakzinmiwaan
     2+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+2+Pl+Loc: gmakzinmiwaang
     2+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+2+Pl+Pl: gmakzinmiwaan
     3+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+2+Pl+4: makzinmiwaan
     3+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+2+Pl+Loc: makzinmiwaang
     3+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+2+Pl+Pl: makzinmiwaan
     3+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+3+4+4: makzinminwan
     3+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+3+4+Loc: makzinminiing
     3+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+3+4+Pl: makzinminwan
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 6, 7
     1+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+Prt+4: nmakzinmibniin
     1+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+Prt+Loc: nmakzinmibniing
     1+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+Prt+Pl: nmakzinmibniin
     2+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+Prt+4: gmakzinmibniin
     2+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+Prt+Loc: gmakzinmibniing
     2+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+Prt+Pl: gmakzinmibniin
     3+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+Prt+4: makzinmibniin
     3+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+Prt+Loc: makzinmibniing
     3+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+Prt+Pl: makzinmibniin
     X+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+Prt+4: makzinmibniin
     X+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+Prt+Loc: makzinmibniing
     X+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+Prt+Pl: makzinmibniin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5, 6
